Maryland, session 2026, HB1023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 5. LAB–GROWN MEAT.
21–501.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “LAB–GROWN MEAT” MEANS MEAT OR A MEAT PRODUCT
THAT CONTAINS ANIMAL TISSUE CULTURED FROM ANIMAL CELLS OUTSIDE THE
ANIMAL FROM WHICH THE TISSUE IS DERIVED.
21–502.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1023*

HOUSE BILL 1023
(A) A PERSON MAY NOT SELL, OFFER TO SELL, DISTRIBUTE, OR
MANUFACTURE IN THE STATE LAB–GROWN MEAT FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION.
(B) (1) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS LIABLE FOR A CIVIL
PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 TO BE COLLECTED IN A CIVIL ACTION IN THE
DISTRICT COURT FOR ANY COUNTY.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE PENALTY ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE SECRETARY MAY SEIZE OR CONDEMN LAB–GROWN
MEAT SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, DISTRIBUTED, OR MANUFACTURED IN VIOLATION
OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.